Rhode Island statutes. Title 36 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 6 Salaries and Traveling Expenses

36-6-1.
Salary of governor.

Until December 31, 1998, the salary of the governor shall be sixty-nine thousand nine hundred dollars ($69,900) per annum. After December 31, 1998, the salary of the governor shall be ninety-five thousand dollars ($95,000) per annum and shall thereafter be adjusted at the beginning of each succeeding term by the total percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers (CPI-U) published by the United States Department of Labor Bureau of Labor Statistics for the Northeast Region for the four (4) previous fiscal years, but in any event not to exceed twelve percent (12%).

History of Section.

P.L. 1948, ch. 2157, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-6-1

; P.L. 1962, ch. 147, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 219, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 166, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 360, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 287, art. 31, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 282, § 1.

36-6-2.
Salaries of other general state officers.

Until December 31, 1998, the salary of the lieutenant governor shall be fifty-two thousand dollars ($52,000) per annum; the salary of the secretary of state shall be fifty-two thousand dollars ($52,000) per annum; and the salary of the attorney general shall be fifty-five thousand dollars ($55,000) per annum; the salary of the general treasurer shall be fifty-two thousand dollars ($52,000) per annum. After December 31, 1998, the salary of the lieutenant governor shall be eighty thousand dollars ($80,000); the salary of the secretary of state shall be eighty thousand dollars ($80,000); the salary of the attorney general shall be eighty-five thousand dollars ($85,000); and the salary of the general treasurer shall be eighty thousand dollars ($80,000); and they shall thereafter be adjusted as set forth in §

36-6-1

.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate such sum as it may deem necessary to carry out the purposes of this section; and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of that sum, or so much thereof as may be required from time to time, upon receipt by him or her of properly authenticated vouchers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2769, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-6-2

; P.L. 1962, ch. 147, § 2; P.L. 1967, ch. 219, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 166, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 145, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 360, § 1; P.L 1986, ch. 287, art. 31, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 282, § 1.

36-6-3.
Salaries of directors of state departments.

The general officers of the state shall receive such annual salaries as the general assembly may by law determine. Directors shall receive such annual salaries as may be from time to time established by the unclassified pay plan board which shall consist of seven (7) members as provided in §

36-4-16

. The state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of such sums, or so much thereof, as may be required from time to time, upon receipt by him or her of properly authenticated vouchers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 9; P.L. 1951, ch. 2821, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3535, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3852, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-6-3

; P.L. 1960, ch. 137, § 2; P.L. 1963, ch. 101, § 2; P.L. 1964, ch. 238, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 182, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1973, ch. 60, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 208, § 4.

36-6-4.
Subordinates in state agencies.

The director of a department or the head of any other agency of the state shall appoint such assistants and other subordinates as he or she may deem necessary within the amounts appropriated therefor and shall fix their respective salaries.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 232; G.L. 1956, §

36-6-4

.

36-6-5.
Manner of compensation prescribed by appropriation law.

All officials and employees shall be compensated in the manner provided by the annual appropriation act or as may hereafter otherwise be prescribed by law. This section shall not apply to the directors of the several departments of the state of Rhode Island or to the general officers of the state of Rhode Island whose salaries shall be fixed by the general assembly.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 230; P.L. 1942, ch. 1214, § 2; P.L. 1951, ch. 2737, §§ 1, 2; G.L. 1956, §

36-6-5

.

36-6-6.
Salaries in lieu of fees.

The salary received from the state by any deputy sheriff, clerk of any court, or other officer by whom fees are received as a part of his or her official duties shall be in full compensation for all services rendered by him or her personally to the state. That salary shall be in lieu of all fees which he or she or his or her deputies, assistants, or subordinates are now or were formerly authorized to receive for those services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 230; P.L. 1942, ch. 1214, § 2; P.L. 1951, ch. 2737, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-6-6

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 71.

36-6-7.
Fees turned over to general treasurer.

It shall be the duty of any deputy sheriff to turn over to the general treasurer at least once each month all fees received by him or her in his or her official capacity as deputy sheriff. It shall be the duty of the clerks of all district courts and the clerks of all superior courts to turn over to the general treasurer at least once each month all fees actually collected by them under the laws of the state in their official capacities as clerks of the several courts, excepting however, all naturalization fees received by any clerk. In the event that any state official or employee fails for a period of more than one month to turn over all fees collected by him or her during the previous month, it shall be the duty of the general treasurer to notify the attorney general who, if he or she is of the opinion that there has been a dereliction of duty, shall immediately proceed in any proper action of law to recover the sum due the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 230; P.L. 1942, ch. 1214, § 2; P.L. 1951, ch. 2737, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-6-7

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 71.

36-6-8.
Arraignment fees in district court.

No judge of the district court shall charge or receive any fee for the arraignment before him or her of any person in any criminal case, except such as may legally be taxed as a part of the costs in the case, and all of which shall be paid over to the general treasurer as hereinbefore provided.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660; P.L. 1942, ch. 1214, § 2; P.L. 1951, ch. 2737, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-6-8

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 41.

36-6-9.
Travel expenses of superior court and family court justices, clerks, and attorney general and assistants.

The justices of the superior court, the chief judge and associate justices of the family court, and the stenographic clerks of those courts, when sitting or in attendance at any session of those courts held in any county other than Providence County shall be allowed and paid, in addition to their salaries, their actual traveling expenses for travel within the state of Rhode Island in connection with their attendance at those courts. The attorney general and the assistant attorneys general shall also be allowed and paid their actual traveling expenses for travel within the state of Rhode Island when performing official duties outside of Providence County. The general assembly shall annually appropriate a sum sufficient for the payment of those expenses and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of that sum, or so much thereof as may from time to time be required, upon receipt by him or her of proper vouchers duly authenticated.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 294, § 13; P.L. 1898, ch. 524, § 1; C.P.A. 1905, § 1197; G.L. 1909, ch. 363, § 14; P.L. 1922, ch. 2159, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 416, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 632, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; P.L. 1939, ch. 703, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-6-9

; P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 12; P.L. 1994, ch. 222, § 1.

36-6-10.
Biweekly payment of salaries.

All salaries of state employees and officials shall be payable biweekly and the biweekly rate shall be one twenty-sixth (1/26) of the annual rate. The biweekly rate shall be considered to be complete payment of the annual rate.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 294, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 363, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 416, § 1; P.L. 1936, ch. 2287, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 632, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 2874, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-6-10

.

36-6-11.
Withholding tax deductions.

The state controller is hereby authorized and directed to make appropriate salary deductions from the salary or wages of each employee of the state, or of any agency thereof, in compliance with the withholding provisions of the internal revenue code of the United States of America, and all amendments thereto, and to make all necessary and appropriate reports and payments required thereby. The action of the state controller in making those deductions, reports, and payments, is hereby ratified and confirmed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1491, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-6-11

.

36-6-12.
Deductions for hospitalization or medical service payments.

The general treasurer and the director of administration shall adopt procedures for and apply the provisions of state payroll deduction for state officers and employees for payments to any nonprofit hospital service corporation organized pursuant to chapter 19 of title 27, or to any other charitable organization authorized to do business in this state under the laws of this state or of the United States under any plan for hospitalization or medical service, and those payments shall be deducted from the payroll by the general treasurer and the director of administration and remitted by them from time to time to the corporation or other organization, as the case may be; provided, however, that neither the general treasurer, the director of administration, nor the state shall incur any liability to the corporation, other charitable organization, or to any officer or employee of this state by reason hereof or by reason of any failure to make the deduction or remittance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1599, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

36-6-12

.

36-6-13.
Medical deductions voluntary — Termination.

Medical deductions shall be made from payrolls only at the written request of the state officer or employee and the continuing deduction may be terminated at any time upon the written request of the state officer or employee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1599, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

36-6-13

.

36-6-14.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1599, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

36-6-14

; Repealed by P.L. 1981, ch. 276, § 2. For present provisions of law, see §

36-6-19

.

36-6-15.
Medical deductions by cities and towns.

Any city or town in the state through its legislative body may enact ordinances providing for the deduction from the compensation of city or town officers and employees for payments under the hospitalization or medical service plan of the nonprofit hospital service corporation or other charitable organization providing that service.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1599, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

36-6-15

.

36-6-16.
Credit union deductions.

The controller shall adopt a procedure for and apply the provisions of state payroll deduction for state officers and employees for payments to the Rhode Island state employees’ credit union, (a corporation founded under the banking laws of the state of Rhode Island on August 16, 1946, first, to help state employees build for the future by a regular savings plan, encouraged by interest, or dividends, that the profits would allow it to pay, and, secondly, to aid those in need by advancing money, repayable over a period of time in biweekly installments, at the lowest possible rate of interest), and to the credit union of the American federation of state, county, and municipal employees, (a corporation founded under the banking laws of the state of Rhode Island on February 28, 1963, first to help the members of the local union chapters of that federation build for the future by a regular savings plan, encouraged by interest, or dividends, that the profits would allow it to pay, and, secondly, to aid those in need by advancing money, repayable over a period of time in biweekly installments, at the lowest possible rate of interest as the case may be), and those payments shall be deducted from the payroll by the controller and general treasurer and remitted by them from time to time to the Rhode Island state employees’ credit union and to the credit union of the American federation of state, county, and municipal employees as the case may be; provided, however, that no deduction shall be made without a written authorization being filed by the employee with the controller; provided, further, however, that neither the controller, the general treasurer, nor the state shall incur any liability to the Rhode Island state employee’s credit union or to the credit union of the American federation of state, county, and municipal employees, or to any officer or employee of this state, or to any officer, director, or member of those credit unions by reason hereof or by reason of any failure to make any deduction or remittance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1949, ch. 2337, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-6-16

; P.L. 1964, ch. 197, § 1.

36-6-17.
Deductions for union dues.

Upon written authorization of any state employee who is a member of any bona fide labor union or who voluntarily elects to pay dues or fees to a union, the state controller shall deduct from the employee’s salary his or her dues as a member or fees and shall remit, together with a list by departments of the members or fee payers whose payments have been deducted, the amounts so deducted, to the treasurer of the labor union, designated by the employee in the request; provided, however, that where a labor union has been recognized as the sole and exclusive bargaining representative for an appropriate unit, only the dues or fees for the sole and exclusive bargaining representative shall be deducted. The state controller shall make dues or fee deductions, on an ongoing basis, unless the employee files a written notice requesting termination of the payments, with the exclusive bargaining representative.

In the case of an employee employed in an area where there is no certified exclusive bargaining organization, the request for dues deductions or fees to a bona fide labor union shall be voluntary and shall take effect thirty (30) days after presentation. If the employer and the selected sole and exclusive bargaining representative have reached an agreement regarding the payment of dues or fees or the employee on a voluntary basis elects to pay dues or fees, then the state controller shall make dues or fee deductions on an ongoing basis, unless the employee files a written notice requesting termination of the payments with the exclusive bargaining representative.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3559, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-6-17

; P.L. 1968, ch. 78, § 1; P.L. 1971, ch. 260, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 256, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 95, § 3; P.L. 2019, ch. 146, § 3; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 2, § 20.

36-6-18.
Additional vacation time for career state employees.

State employees, classified, nonclassified, or unclassified, who have been in the service of the state for at least twenty (20) years shall be credited annually with five (5) days additional vacation time.

All state employees may have prior service time with a state of Rhode Island municipality credited to their present state service for the purpose of computing vacation accrual under the provisions of this section.

All state employees may have prior service time including service as an elected official with a state municipality credited to their present state service for the purpose of computing vacation accrual under the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 101, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 506, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 609, § 1.

36-6-19.
Hospital care, hospital surgical-medical, and dental services benefits for general assembly members.

All members of the general assembly shall be eligible to receive hospital services, surgical-medical services, and dental services, rights and benefits including, but not limited to, the equivalent of the semi-private benefit plan of blue cross of Rhode Island, a surgical-medical plan equivalent to the plan 100 of blue shield of Rhode Island, a major medical plan equivalent to the major medical plan of blue cross of Rhode Island and blue shield of Rhode Island, a prescription drug plan equivalent to the prescription drug plan of blue shield of Rhode Island, and a dental plan equivalent to delta dental of Rhode Island, both in form as presently and from time to time hereafter in effect for state employees and on file with and approved by the state department of business regulation, or hospital services, surgical-medical services, and other services, rights, and benefits provided by other nonprofit hospital service corporations, medical service corporations, dental service corporations, or other insurance corporations, which benefits shall be the equivalent of the benefits and services of the above described plans.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 276, § 3.

36-6-20.
Hospital care and hospital surgical-medical service benefits for retired general assembly members.

All retired members of the general assembly who meet all eligibility requirements for retirement and all former members of the general assembly who meet all eligibility requirements for retirement except for age shall be eligible to purchase at their own cost and expense the same benefits provided for active general assembly members under §

36-6-19

. The cost for participation shall be deducted directly from the retired general assembly member’s monthly retirement proceeds. Retired or former members of the general assembly who are not receiving monthly retirement proceeds shall pay for those benefits through the joint committee on legislative services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 264, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 106, § 1.

36-6-21.
Mass transportation and fringe benefit program deductions.

The state controller is hereby authorized and directed to make appropriate salary deductions, effective January 1, 2008, and to adopt appropriate provisions to allow state officers and employees the option to exclude employee commuting costs incurred from the purchase of RIPTA commuting passes from taxable wages and compensation, consistent with section 132 of title 26, United States Code, not to exceed the maximum level allowed by law (26 U.S.C. § 132(f)(2). RIPTA is hereby authorized and directed to cooperate with the state controller in developing provisions to implement this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 409, § 1.

36-6-21.1.
State employee transportation guide plan.

Findings: Rhode Island is dedicated to environmental protection, efficient use of resources, sound fiscal policy, and sustainable development. Reducing vehicle miles traveled for commuting to work can lead to reductions in air pollution emissions, greenhouse gases, energy consumption, road congestion, and parking shortages. Reduced vehicle miles traveled would also lead to lower total motor fuel consumption, keeping more energy dollars that now flow out-of-state available in the state for local consumption and investment; a state government plan to reduce “drive alone” commuting and an increase in carpooling, transit use, and walk-to-work modes is required. State government, as a major employer can lead by example in promoting alternative forms of travel that can reduce vehicle miles traveled.

The department of administration shall set up a committee on state employee transportation which shall consist of the directors of the department of administration, RIDOT, RIDEM, RIDOH and statewide planning, or their designees, the general manager of RIPTA or designee, and a representative from a state employee union, to develop, publicize, and implement a plan to give incentives to state employees to reduce vehicle miles in commuting to work. The committee will investigate employee incentives for reducing commuting vehicle miles offered by other public bodies around the country, investigate practices developed by the environmental protection agency’s “Best Workplaces for Commuters Program”, consider the implementation of carpool, telecommuting, guaranteed-ride-home, bike-to-work and walk-to-work programs, and incorporate or adopt those ideas deemed appropriate for Rhode Island into the plan. The plan shall include, but is not limited to, a means for determining base year values of the proportion of single occupant vehicle commute trips and the commute trip vehicle miles traveled per employee and progress toward meeting commute trip reduction plan goals on an annual basis. The goals of miles traveled per employee for all state agencies shall not be less than fifteen percent (15%) reduction from the base year value by January 1, 2012, twenty-five percent (25%) reduction from the base year values by January 1, 2014, and thirty-five percent (35%) reduction from the base year values by January 1, 2016. The plan will also include an offer of a RIPTA transit pass to employees in lieu of parking privileges.

The director of the department of administration shall report annually to the governor and the committee as to the progress being made to meet the goals.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 250, § 1.

36-6-22.
Longevity payments.

Beginning on July 1, 2011, notwithstanding any rule, regulation, or provision of the public laws or general laws to the contrary, there shall be no further longevity increases for officers, secretaries, and employees of the legislative branch, the judicial branch, the office of the governor, the office of the lieutenant governor, the department of state, the department of the attorney general, and the treasury department; provided, however, for employees with longevity provisions pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement in effect on June 1, 2011, longevity increases shall cease beginning on July 1, 2011 or beginning upon the expiration of the applicable collective bargaining agreement, whichever occurs later. To the extent an employee has previously accrued longevity payments, the employee shall continue to receive the same longevity percentage in effect on June 30, 2011, or in the case of an employee with longevity provisions pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement in effect on June 1, 2011, the same longevity percentage in effect on June 30, 2011 or upon the expiration of the applicable collective bargaining agreement, whichever occurs later.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 8, § 5.